Florida, session 2026, SB1640.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 409.9079, Florida Statutes, is created 28 to read: 29 409.9079âMedicaid dental pilot program for persons with 30 disabilities in Region E.â 31 (1)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term âpersons 32 with disabilitiesâ means Medicaid-eligible individuals who: 33 (a)âReceive Supplemental Security Income (SSI) on the basis 34 of disability; 35 (b)âAre enrolled in a home and community-based services 36 (HCBS) waiver program under s. 1915(c) of the Social Security 37 Act; or 38 (c)âMeet federal disability criteria under 42 U.S.C. s. 39 1382c(a)(3), as determined by the Social Security Administration 40 or the state Medicaid program. 41 (2)âPILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED.âThe agency shall establish 42 and operate a 3-year Medicaid dental pilot program in Region E 43 of the Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program to provide 44 enhanced dental services to persons with disabilities. 45 (3)âELIGIBILITY.âParticipation in the pilot program is 46 limited to persons with disabilities who reside in Region E and 47 are enrolled in the Medicaid program. 48 (4)âCOVERED SERVICES.â 49 (a)âDental services provided under the pilot program must 50 include all of the following: 51 1.âRoutine diagnostic and preventive care, including 52 examinations, cleanings, and radiographs. 53 2.âBasic dental services, including fillings and 54 extractions. 55 3.âMajor dental services, including root canals, crowns, 56 dentures, and other dental prostheses. 57 4.âEmergency dental services. 58 5.âAny additional dental services the agency determines are 59 necessary to promote oral health and prevent disease. 60 (b)âServices provided under this subsection supplement, and 61 do not replace, dental benefits available under ss. 409.906 and 62 409.973. 63 (5)âREIMBURSEMENT.âThe agency shall reimburse providers of 64 dental services under the pilot program at a rate equivalent to 65 80 percent of the 50th percentile of the 2024 Usual, Customary, 66 and Reasonable fees, as determined by the American Dental 67 Association or a comparable benchmark approved by the agency. 68 (6)âMANAGED CARE PARTICIPATION.âThe pilot program must be 69 delivered through at least two licensed dental managed care 70 organizations that meet agency standards and have demonstrated 71 experience in providing dental services to persons with 72 disabilities. 73 (7)âFEDERAL APPROVAL.âThe agency shall submit for federal 74 approval any Medicaid state plan amendments or federal waiver 75 applications necessary to implement the pilot program. 76 (8)âEVALUATION; REPORT.â 77 (a)âThe agency shall collect pilot program data on all of 78 the following: 79 1.âAccess to dental care. 80 2.âUtilization of services. 81 3.âReimbursement expenditures. 82 4.âOral health outcomes for participants. 83 (b)âBy January 1, 2029, the agency shall submit a report to 84 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 85 the House of Representatives evaluating the effectiveness of the 86 pilot program and recommending whether it should be expanded 87 statewide. 88 (9)âEXPIRATION.âThis section expires June 30, 2029. 89 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.